Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 16 Life Insurance and Annuity Contracts

Cross references. —

For definition of “life insurance,” see §

26-5-102

.

For provision as to life insurance upon individual or person in whom he has an insurable interest, see §

26-15-102

.

As to group life insurance, see §§

26-17-101

through

26-17-130

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 533 to 549; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 978 to 1003, 1052 to 1107, 1448 to 1450.

Third person's statements included in or with proof of death as admissible against beneficiary of life insurance policy, 1 ALR2d 365.

Temporary life, accident or health insurance pending approval of application or issuance of policy, 2 ALR2d 943.

Construction of contract by party to procure insurance on his own life, 12 ALR2d 983.

Construction and application of provision of life or accident policy relating to aeronautics, 17 ALR2d 1041.

Right to proceeds of life insurance, as between estate of murdered insured and alternative beneficiary named in policy, where murderer was made primary beneficiary, 26 ALR2d 987.

Form and sufficiency of proof of death in case of insured's disappearance, 26 ALR2d 1073.

Coroner's verdict or report as evidence on issue of suicide, 28 ALR2d 352.

Time for making autopsy or demand therefor under insurance policy, 30 ALR2d 837.

Right of beneficiary as against estate of insured who borrowed on the policy, 31 ALR2d 979.

Gift of life insurance policy, 33 ALR2d 273.

Rights of creditors of life insured as to options or other benefits available to him during his lifetime, 37 ALR2d 268.

Loan value or loan proceeds of life insurance policy as subject to rights of creditors of insured, 37 ALR2d 268.

Who is member of crew within aeronautics clause of life policy, 45 ALR2d 454.

What constitutes “participation” in aeronautics within provision of life policy relating to aeronautics, 45 ALR2d 462.

Testamentary direction for payment of debts or expenses of administration as affecting life insurance proceeds payable to estate, 56 ALR2d 865.

Presumption against suicide as overcome as a matter of law by physical facts related to death in action on life insurance policy, 85 ALR2d 722.

Construction of “sane or insane” provision of suicide exclusion, 9 ALR3d 1015.

Killing of insured by beneficiary as affecting life insurance or its proceeds, 27 ALR3d 794.

Beneficiary's ignorance of existence of life insurance policy as excusing failure to give notice, make proof of loss or bring action within time limited by policy or statute, 28 ALR3d 292.

Coverage of airplane passengers trip insurance policy, 29 ALR3d 766.

Remedies and measure of damages for wrongful cancellation of life insurance, 34 ALR3d 245.

Suicide clause of life insurance as affected by incontestable clause, 37 ALR3d 337.

Time when period provided for in suicide clause of life insurance policy begins to run, 37 ALR3d 933.

Rights under insurance policy on joint lives where one insured is feloniously killed by the other, 42 ALR3d 1116.

Insurance on aircraft; risks and losses covered, 48 ALR3d 1120.

Who is “fare paying passenger” within coverage provision of life insurance policy, 60 ALR3d 1273.

Term “children” as used in beneficiary clause of life insurance policy as including illegitimate child, 62 ALR3d 1329.

Duty of insurer to give assignee of life policy notice of premiums due, 68 ALR3d 360.

Right of named beneficiary, upon change of beneficiary, to recover premiums paid on life insurance policy, 92 ALR3d 1330.

Liability of insurer for damages resulting from delay in passing upon an application for life insurance, 1 ALR4th 1202.

Heart attack following exertion or exercise as within terms of accident provision of insurance policy, 1 ALR4th 1319.

Effectiveness of change of named beneficiary of life or accident insurance policy by will, 25 ALR4th 1164.

Insurer's tort liability for wrongful or negligent issuance of life policy, 37 ALR4th 972.

Divorce and separation: method of valuation of life insurance policies in connection with trial court's division of property, 54 ALR4th 1203.

Death or injury from taking illegal drugs or narcotics as accidental or result of accidental means within insurance coverage, 32 ALR5th 629.

45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 696 to 754; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 986 to 995, 1168 to 1194; 46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1414 to 1443.